Washington statutes.
RCW 18.55.040

License applicants—Qualifications—Examination.

No applicant shall be licensed under this chapter until the applicant complies with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees determined by the secretary according to RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. Qualifications must require that the applicant:

(1) Is eighteen years or more of age;

(2) Has graduated from high school or has received a high school equivalency certificate as provided in RCW 28B.50.536;

(3) Is of good moral character; and

(4)(a) Had at least ten thousand hours of apprenticeship training under the direct supervision of a licensed ocularist; or

(b) Successfully completed a prescribed course in ocularist training programs approved by the secretary; or

(c) Has had at least ten thousand hours of apprenticeship training under the direct supervision of a practicing ocularist, or has the equivalent experience as a practicing ocularist, or any combination of training and supervision, not in the state of Washington; and

(5) Successfully passes an examination conducted or approved by the secretary.

[ 2013 c 39 s 2; 1996 c 191 s 32; 1991 c 180 s 4; (1991 c 3 s 144 repealed by 1991 sp.s. c 11 s 2); 1985 c 7 s 53; 1980 c 101 s 4.]